Tennessee, session 114, SB2527.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-37-309, is amended by adding the
following after the first sentence:
Such certification must be included within the board of trustees' annual report
published pursuant to § 8-34-316.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2527
011356
- 1 -